Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 20 Interlocal Cooperation Act
25-20-502. Creation.

Any two (2) or more public agencies entering into an interlocal agreement under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, § 25-20-101 et seq., for the purpose of consolidating wastewater systems may create a public body corporate and politic as a separate legal entity for the purpose of constructing, owning, managing, operating, financing, mortgaging, granting security interests in, improving, extending, acquiring, reconstructing, equipping, selling, leasing, contracting concerning, dealing in, disposing of, and maintaining a consolidated wastewater system.

The governing body of each public agency wishing to create a public body under this subchapter shall approve by ordinance or resolution or otherwise the filing of an application with the Secretary of State to create a public body under this subchapter and approve an interlocal agreement specifying the matters set forth in § 25-20-104. The interlocal agreement shall:

Specify limitations on the exercise of the public body's powers, including without limitation matters in which the participating public agencies reserve rights to approve, disapprove, or otherwise participate in any exercise of the public body's powers;

Provide for reasonable franchise fees, payments in lieu of taxes, or other payments by the public body to the participating public agencies as the public agencies find appropriate;

Specify the number of commissioners of the public body, the terms of office of the commissioners, the manner of appointing or electing the commissioners, the residency requirements, if any, applicable to commissioners in addition to those set forth in this subchapter, and the voting rights of each commissioner, which voting rights may vary by commissioner; and

Set forth other matters consistent with this subchapter concerning the creation and operation of the public body as the participating public agencies find necessary or appropriate.

An application to create a public body under this subchapter shall set forth:

A request that a public body corporate and politic be created under this subchapter;

The proposed name for the public body;

The names of the participating public agencies;

The number of commissioners of the public body;

The manner in which commissioners of the public body will be appointed or elected and the residency requirements, if any, applicable to commissioners in addition to those set forth in this subchapter;

The voting rights of each commissioner;

Special procedures for amending the certificate of incorporation, if any; and

Other matters consistent with this subchapter concerning the creation and operation of the public body as the participating public agencies find necessary or appropriate.

The application shall be signed on behalf of each participating public agency by an authorized official of the public agency.

The Secretary of State shall examine the application, and if the Secretary of State finds that the name proposed for the public body is not identical with that of any other corporation, agency, or instrumentality of this state, so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, or otherwise deceptively misleading, the Secretary of State shall:

Receive and file the application;

Record the application in an appropriate book of record in his or her office;

Make and issue a certificate of incorporation under the seal of the state setting forth the name of the public body and the names of the participating public agencies; and

Record the certificate in an appropriate book of record in his or her office.

A copy of the certificate of incorporation certified by the Secretary of State shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of or relating to any contract of the public body and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents of the certificate and the effective creation of the public body under this subchapter, absent fraud in the premises being established.

Any certificate of incorporation issued by the Secretary of State under this subchapter may be amended from time to time in the manner provided in the certificate of incorporation then existing or, if the certificate of incorporation does not specify a procedure for its amendment, with the consent of a majority of the commissioners of the public body who are entitled to vote.

The amendment shall be signed by an officer or other authorized person of the public body, who shall certify that the certificate of incorporation has been amended in accordance with this subchapter and, as applicable, in the manner prescribed in the then-existing certificate of incorporation.

On the filing of the amendment with the Secretary of State under this section, the Secretary of State shall make and issue an amendment to the certificate of incorporation.

Participating public agencies are authorized to contribute to a public body created under this subchapter such real and personal property of the participating public agencies as the participating public agencies find necessary or appropriate to the ownership and operation of a consolidated wastewater system by the public body, provided that:

Contributions of properties under this section shall be on the terms and conditions and for consideration as the participating public agencies find just and proper, it being within the participating public agencies' discretion to contribute property with or without monetary consideration.

Participating public agencies may execute contracts, leases, deeds, bills of sale, easements, assignments, and other instruments of conveyance as may be required or convenient to exercise the powers granted in this section.

(1)Each public body created under this subchapter shall have a board of commissioners consisting of at least three (3) commissioners, with each commissioner residing within the jurisdiction of one (1) of the participating public agencies and otherwise meeting any residency requirements under the public body's certificate of incorporation.

The commissioners shall not receive compensation for their services but shall be entitled to reimbursement of expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Before entering upon their duties, the commissioners shall take and file with the Secretary of State an oath of office swearing to discharge faithfully their duties in the manner provided by law.

(1)(A)The board of commissioners shall meet and organize by electing one (1) of their number as chair, one (1) as vice chair, one (1) as secretary, and one (1) as treasurer.

Officers shall be elected annually thereafter in like manner.

The duties of secretary and treasurer may be performed by the same commissioner.

The secretary may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the public body.

The secretary may certify under the official seal of the public body that the copies are true copies, and persons dealing with the public body may rely upon the certification.

All powers, business, and affairs of any public body under this subchapter shall be exercised and managed under the direction of its board of commissioners, subject to any limitation under the public body's certificate of incorporation or interlocal agreement.

The duties of the board of commissioners include without limitation:

Performing other duties under the interlocal agreement.

Apply for and receive permits, licenses, certificates, and approvals as may be necessary and own and operate facilities in accordance therewith;

Employ the services of all personnel necessary to its operations and, in connection therewith, adopt and implement such healthcare, disability, bonus, retirement, and other employee benefit plans as the board of commissioners find appropriate;

Employ the services of professionals;

Purchase insurance, maintain reserves for self-insurance, and become self-insured for the payment of workers' compensation under § 11-9-404(a)(2), provided that the deposit of an indemnity bond, letter of credit, or securities shall not be required;

Purchase, receive, own, hold, improve, use, lease, sell, convey, exchange, transfer, assign, mortgage, pledge, and otherwise acquire, dispose of, and deal with real and personal property and any legal or equitable interest therein in its own name;

Apply for, receive, and use loans, grants, taxes, donations, and contributions from any public agency or other lawful source, including any proceeds from the sale of bonds;

Borrow money on a secured or unsecured basis, and in connection therewith issue bonds, promissory notes, or other evidence of indebtedness, and make and deliver indentures, mortgages, pledges, security agreements, financing statements, and other instruments encumbering assets of the public body;

Pay reasonable franchise fees, make payments in lieu of taxes, or otherwise make payments to the participating public agencies in such amounts as may be required or permitted by the participating public agencies;

Exercise such other powers, privileges, and authorities as the participating public agencies have delegated to the public body by the public agency interlocal agreement, subject to any restrictions imposed thereon by the interlocal agreement or applicable law; and

Have such other and further powers relating to the ownership and operation of wastewater systems as are now by law given to the governing body of any participating public agency and do all other acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of and to exercise the powers granted to the public body by this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “the public agency interlocal agreement” for “their interlocal agreement” in (a)(13).

Within one (1) year of the creation or expansion of the public body, an independent expert completes a study of rates or charges charged to customers that shows a differential in rates or charges among similarly situated classes of customers located within the jurisdictions of the participating public agencies, and the public body equalizes rates or charges among similarly situated classes of customers within ten (10) years of the date of the rate study; or

Within one (1) year of the creation or expansion of the public body, an independent expert completes an engineering study of the consolidated wastewater system infrastructure located within the jurisdiction or jurisdictions of the participating public agencies that identifies improvements needed to create a uniform infrastructure quality throughout the jurisdictions, rate differentials among otherwise similarly situated classes of customers are reasonably calculated to recover from customers located in the jurisdictions in which the improvements are made the costs incurred in making the improvements, and the public body equalizes rates or charges among similarly situated classes of customers within ten (10) years of the date of the engineering study.

The inability of a public body to rely upon either safe harbor defense under subdivisions (c)(3)(A) and (c)(3)(B)(i) of this section shall not create any implication that the public body has failed to equalize any differentials in wastewater rates or charges among similarly situated classes of customers within a reasonable period of time after its creation or expansion.

If any rate or charge established is not paid within thirty (30) days after it is due, the amount of the rate or charge together with a penalty of ten percent (10%) and a reasonable attorney's fee may be:

A public body under this subchapter may extend its collection system and provide wastewater services to any customer located outside the jurisdictions of the public body's participating public agencies.

Use of the consolidated wastewater system and extensions of services under this section may be made at such rates and charges and on such other terms as the board of commissioners finds just and reasonable, and the rates and charges need not be the same as the rates and charges charged customers within the jurisdictions of the public body's participating public agencies.

A public body under this subchapter may acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property, rights, easements, franchises, and other property that it finds necessary for its purposes under § 18-15-301 et seq. or § 18-15-401 et seq. or in the manner provided by law under which one (1) of the public body's participating public agencies may exercise a power of eminent domain.

In exercising the power of eminent domain, a public body shall have the right by its agents or employees to peacefully enter upon any lands, structures, or rights-of-way to make surveys, tests, and measurements thereon but is liable for any damage that may result by reason of its actions.

If a public body under this subchapter owns or operates a consolidated wastewater system and desires to construct improvements, betterments, and extensions thereto, it may issue revenue bonds under this section for the payment thereof.

The issuance of bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the board of commissioners.

The bonds may be issued as registered bonds and may be exchangeable for bonds of another denomination or in another form.

The bonds may be in such form and denominations, may have such date or dates, may be stated to mature at such time or times, may bear interest payable at such times and at such rate or rates, may be payable at such places within or without the state, may be subject to such terms of redemption in advance of maturity at such prices, and may contain such terms and conditions as the board of commissioners determines.

The bonds shall have all the qualities of and shall be negotiable instruments under the laws of the State of Arkansas, subject to provisions as to registration under this section.

The authorizing resolution may contain other terms, covenants, and conditions that the board of commissioners finds reasonable and desirable, including without limitation conditions concerning the maintenance of various funds and reserves, the nature and extent of any security for payment of the bonds, the custody and application of the proceeds of the bonds, the collection and disposition of revenues, the investing for authorized purposes, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the public body and the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

The authorizing resolution may provide for the execution of a trust indenture between the public body and any financial institution within or without the State of Arkansas.

The trust indenture may contain any terms, covenants, and conditions found desirable by the board of commissioners, including without limitation conditions concerning the maintenance of various funds and reserves, the nature and extent of any security for the payment of the bonds, the custody and application of the proceeds of the bonds, the collection and disposition of revenues, the investing and reinvesting of any moneys during periods not needed for authorized purposes, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the public body and the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

An authorizing resolution and trust indenture relating to the issuance and security of the bonds shall constitute a contract between the public body and holders and registered owners of the bonds, which contract and all covenants, agreements, and obligations therein shall be promptly performed in strict compliance with the terms and provisions of the contract, and the covenants, agreements, and obligations of the public body may be enforced by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding in a court of proper jurisdiction.

The resolution shall fix the minimum rate or rates for the use of and the service rendered by the consolidated wastewater system to be collected prior to the payment of all of the bonds, with exceptions as may be provided in the resolution, and shall pledge the revenues derived from the consolidated wastewater system or any specified portion of the consolidated wastewater system for the purpose of paying the bonds and interest thereon.

The rates to be charged for the services of the consolidated wastewater system or the specified portion of the consolidated wastewater system with revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds shall be sufficient to provide for the payment of all principal of and interest on all bonds when due, to provide for the operation and maintenance of the consolidated wastewater system or the specified portion of the consolidated wastewater system with revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds, and to provide an adequate depreciation account for the consolidated wastewater system or the specified portion of the consolidated wastewater system with revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds.

The proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds shall be used solely for the purpose of making betterments, improvements, and extensions to the consolidated wastewater system owned and operated by the public body, paying interest on the bonds during the period of construction of the betterments, improvements, and extensions, establishing any necessary reserves for the bonds, paying the costs of issuing the bonds, and paying any other costs and expenditures of whatever nature incidental to the accomplishment of the betterments, improvements, and extensions.

The terms “betterments”, “improvements”, and “extensions” include a wastewater and collection system, including land, mains, interceptors, collector lines, manholes, force mains, valves, pumping stations, pumps, treatment and pretreatment plants and units thereof, as well as all other real and personal property, buildings, structures, or other improvements or facilities that may be necessary or advisable for the proper and efficient operation of the public body's consolidated wastewater system.

Bonds issued under this section shall be payable solely from revenues derived from the consolidated wastewater system or any specified portion of the consolidated wastewater system.

The bonds shall not constitute in any event an indebtedness of nor pledge the faith and credit of the State of Arkansas or the participating public agencies within the meaning of any constitutional provisions or limitations.

It shall be stated plainly on the face of each bond that:

It is issued under this subchapter;

It does not constitute an indebtedness of the State of Arkansas or the participating public agencies within any constitutional provisions or limitations; and

It is not backed by the full faith and credit of the State of Arkansas or the participating public agencies.

The bonds and the interest thereon shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxation, including income taxation and inheritance taxation.

The bonds may be sold in such manner, either at public or private sale, and upon such terms as the board of commissioners finds reasonable and expedient for effectuating the purposes of the public body.

The bonds shall be sold at a price the board of commissioners accepts, including sale at discount.

The bonds shall be executed by manual or facsimile signature of the chair of the board of commissioners and the manual or facsimile signature of the secretary of the board of commissioners or any other officer of the public body authorized to do so by resolution of the board of commissioners.

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on the bonds cease to be such officers before delivery of the bonds, their signatures shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes.

Each bond shall be impressed or imprinted with the seal of the public body.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment subdivided (k)(3).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-503. Contributions of public agency properties.

Any contributions of reserve funds held in trust under §14-73-101 et seq. shall be made on the condition that the funds may be used only for the purposes described in the trust agreement and until so used shall remain in a trust fund that complies with the requirements of §14-73-101 et seq.; and

Any contribution of sales or use tax proceeds held or to be collected by participating public agencies for wastewater uses shall be used only for the uses designated in the ordinance providing for the approval of those funds.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-504. Board of commissioners.

Each commissioner shall be appointed or elected in the manner set forth in the public body's certificate of incorporation and shall serve a term of office as specified in the interlocal agreement.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-505. Powers and duties of board of commissioners.

Appointing a chief executive officer, who shall not be a member of the board of commissioners, and setting compensation and other terms of employment for such officer;

Approving all budgets of the public entity;

Adopting rules and by-laws that the board of commissioners find necessary and expedient for the proper ownership and operation of the consolidated wastewater system, including adopting such rules and by-laws as the commissioners find necessary and expedient regarding the discharge by any person or entity of any wastewater into the consolidated wastewater system, and altering, changing, or amending the rules and by-laws at its discretion; and

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-506. General powers of public body.

In addition to other powers under this subchapter and unless the certificate of incorporation or interlocal agreement provides otherwise, each public body under this subchapter shall have the power to:

Have perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate;

Maintain offices it finds appropriate;

Execute and perform contracts;

Sue and be sued;

A public body created under this subchapter shall constitute a separate legal entity, but to the extent provided by state law or set forth in the certificate of incorporation of the public body or the interlocal agreement of the participating public agencies, shall be subject to the further supervision or regulation or require the further approval or consent of any participating public agency.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1; 2011, No. 1122, § 4.

25-20-507. Operation of consolidated wastewater system.

“Consolidated wastewater system” means and includes a wastewater and collection system in its entirety, or any integral part thereof, including land, mains, interceptors, collector lines, manholes, force mains, valves, pumping stations, pumps, treatment and pretreatment plants and units thereof, as well as all other real and personal property, buildings, structures, or other improvements or facilities as may be necessary or advisable for the proper and efficient operation of the public body's facilities.

Unless the interlocal agreement provides otherwise, a public body under this subchapter shall have full authority to construct, own, manage, operate, finance, improve, extend, acquire, reconstruct, equip, sell, lease, contract concerning, deal in, dispose of, and maintain a consolidated wastewater system. The assets of the public body may be located inside and outside the jurisdictions of the public body's participating public agencies.

(1)Unless the interlocal agreement provides otherwise, a public body under this subchapter shall have full authority to fix, charge, and collect and from time to time change the rates or charges for the use of and the service rendered by the consolidated wastewater system and other goods and services provided by the public body.

A public body shall have a reasonable time after its creation or after its expansion by the addition of a new participating public agency to equalize any differentials in sewer rates or charges among similarly situated classes of customers.

It shall be a complete defense to any suit or claim based on the charging of differential rates or charges for similarly situated classes of customers that:

Charged by the public body; and

Recovered by the public body in a suit filed in the circuit court where any part of the consolidated wastewater system is located.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-508. Out-of-area sales and services.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-509. Eminent domain.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-510. Improvements — Financing with bonds.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1; 2011, No. 1122, § 5.

25-20-511. Lien in favor of bondholders.

The payment of the principal of bonds issued under this subchapter and the interest thereon may be secured by a lien on and security interest in the consolidated wastewater system or any specified portion of the consolidated wastewater system.

It shall not be necessary to the perfection of the lien and pledge for such purposes that the trustee in connection with such bond issue or the holders of the bonds take possession of the collateral security.

Subject to whatever restrictions may be contained in the resolution or indenture governing the bonds, any holder of bonds issued under this subchapter may enforce in a court of proper jurisdiction the mortgage lien and may compel the performance of the duties of the officers of the issuing public body under this subchapter.

If there is default in the payment of the principal of or interest on any of the bonds, a court of proper jurisdiction may appoint a receiver to administer the consolidated wastewater system or the specified portion of the consolidated wastewater system pledged to the payment of the bonds on behalf of the public body with power to charge and collect rates sufficient to provide for the payment of the bonds and interest thereon and for the payment of the operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues under this subchapter and the resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-512. Refunding bonds.

Bonds may be issued for the purpose of refunding any obligations issued under this subchapter or otherwise. Such refunding bonds may be combined with bonds issued under §25-20-510 into a single issue.

When bonds are issued under this section for refunding purposes, the bonds may either be sold or delivered in exchange for the outstanding obligations. If sold, the proceeds may be applied to the payment of the obligations refunded or deposited into escrow for the retirement thereof either at maturity or upon any authorized redemption date.

(1)All bonds issued under this section shall be authorized, issued, and secured in the manner provided for other bonds issued under this subchapter and shall have all the attributes of such bonds.

The resolution or indenture under which the refunding bonds are issued may provide that any of the refunding bonds shall have the same priority of lien on the revenues pledged for their payment as was enjoyed by the obligations refunded thereby.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-513. Securing deposit of public funds.

Bonds issued under this subchapter shall be eligible to secure the deposit of public funds.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-514. No personal liability.

A commissioner or officer of the public body shall not be liable personally for any reason arising from the issuance of bonds under this subchapter unless he or she acted with a corrupt intent.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-515. Sewer payments by public agencies.

The public agencies shall be subject to the same rates and charges established by the public body for services rendered to the public agencies and shall pay the rates and charges when due.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-516. Zoning exemption.

A public body maintaining facilities in an area zoned after the construction of the facilities may add to, alter, expand, or change the facilities upon that land or upon lands immediately adjacent thereto without regard to the zoning regulation for the area if the board of commissioners finds the action necessary for the proper operation of its consolidated wastewater system.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-517. Tax-exempt status of property owned and income.

Each public body under this subchapter is performing functions as and is a public instrumentality of the participating public agencies, and all properties at any time owned by the public body and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the state.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-518. Immunity.

This subchapter does not affect the immunity of the participating public agencies.

Immunity extends to any public body created under this subchapter and to each commissioner, officer, and employee thereof.

Any franchise fees charged under this section shall be in addition to payments in lieu of taxes permitted under this subchapter.

Payments in lieu of taxes under this section shall be in addition to any franchise fees permitted under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-519. Franchise fees.

A participating public agency that is an Arkansas municipality or county, acting by ordinance or resolution of its governing body, may require a public body under this subchapter to pay a reasonable franchise fee by which the public body may be permitted to occupy the streets, highways, or other public places within the jurisdiction of such public agency, and the ordinance or resolution is prima facie reasonable, provided that a franchise fee shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the public body's operating revenues that are attributable to gross income from wastewater services within the public agency's jurisdiction unless agreed to by the public body or approved by the voters of the public agency.

A public body created under this subchapter is not a public utility under §14-200-101 et seq. or a person, company, or corporation that has secured a franchise from any municipality under §14-200-102.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-520. Payments in lieu of taxes.

A public body under this subchapter shall make annual payments to the general fund of each participating public agency that is an Arkansas municipality or county in lieu of taxes in return for police, fire, and health protection and in return for administrative and other services furnished by the public agency.

The payments shall be an operation and maintenance expense of the public body.

(1)In each calendar year, the payments shall equal the amount the public agency would have received from the public body as real property taxes for the preceding calendar year if the public body's real property located in the public agency's jurisdiction, whether owned or leased by the public body, had been privately owned and subject to tax by the public agency.

For purposes of this computation, the public body's real property shall be deemed to have an assessed value equal to twenty percent (20%) of book value as reflected by the public body's usual accounting procedures.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-521. Annual report and audit.

Within the first ninety (90) days of each calendar year, each public body under this subchapter shall make a written report to the governing bodies of the participating public agencies concerning its activities for the preceding calendar year.

Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operation during the year, including without limitation an audit of the public body's revenues and expenses performed by an independent certified public accountant.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-522. Provisions supplemental and controlling.

This subchapter provides an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized hereby and is supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-523. Construction.

This subchapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish its intent and purposes and shall be the sole authority required for the accomplishment of its purposes, and to this end it shall not be necessary to comply with the provisions of other laws relating to the issuance and sale of the bonds authorized by this subchapter, and this subchapter shall be construed as an additional and alternative method for the issuance and sale of bonds.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.

25-20-524. Property of public body.

Regardless of the beginning date thereof, adverse possession or adverse use of lands or easements owned by a public body created hereunder shall not ripen into title or permanent right.

This section shall have no application to any possession or use which ripened into title or permanent right before the enactment of this section.

Preambles. Acts 1943, No. 166, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, there has been, and is, a definite trend on the part of numerous federal bureaus to invade state boundaries and assume authority not provided in the federal laws which created them;

“Whereas, encroachments on the part of certain federal bureaus are being made under the guise of war measures, when they have no direct connection with the war effort, but are merely creating a greater centralization of government and minimizing government by states;

“And, whereas, throughout the nation there is a rising resentment against unwarranted federal invasion of state boundaries and encroachment on state rights by federal bureaus and bureaucrats, contrary to the spirit and the principles of the Constitution of the United States….”

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1371, § 1.